Utah statutes.
78B-14-503.   Compliance with multiple income-withholding orders.
If an obligor's employer receives two or more income-withholding orders with
respect to the earnings of the same obligor, the employer satisfies the terms
of the multiple orders if the employer complies with the law of the state of
the obligor's principal place of employment to establish the priorities for
the withholding and allocating income withheld for two or more obligees.
